Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.820

Environmental justice obligations of the department of health.

The department must apply and comply with the substantive and procedural requirements of chapter 70A.02 RCW.

[ 2021 c 314 s 4.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 314: See note following RCW 70A.02.005.